Hawaii statutes.
[§311D-2] State council. There
is established within the board of education for administrative purposes the
state council on educational opportunity for military children. The board of
education shall establish the state council, as required by article VIII of the
compact. The membership of the state council shall include, at a minimum:

(1) The superintendent of education or the
superintendent's designee;

(2) The complex area superintendents of the
administrative districts that contain the Leilehua, Radford/Moanalua, and
Kalaheo school complexes;

(3) A complex area superintendent from the Leeward
district;

(4) The military liaison from the department of
education;

(5) A uniformed military representative from the
United States Pacific Command;

(6) One installation-level uniformed military
representative from each branch of service of the Air Force, Army, Marine
Corps, Navy, and Coast Guard;

(7) The governor or the governor's designee;

(8) The chairperson of the senate education committee
or the chairperson's designee;

(9) The chairperson of the house education committee
or the chairperson's designee; and

(10) Other offices and stakeholder groups the state
council deems necessary.

Members of the state council may delegate voting
authority to another person for a specified meeting or meetings. The state
council shall appoint or designate a military family education liaison to
assist military families and the state in facilitating the implementation of
this compact. The compact commissioner and the military family education
liaison designated herein shall be ex-officio members of the state council,
unless either is already a full voting member of the state council.

The council shall establish policies and
procedures governing its operations but subject to the open meeting
requirements of chapter 92. [L 2009, c 152, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 82, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next